California, session 20252026, SB1121.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 34521 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:34521. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, the Office of Emergency Services shall develop and post on its internet website an action plan for responding to electric commercial motor vehicle battery fires.(b) The action plan shall include, at a minimum, best practices that address all of the following:(1) Assessing high-voltage hazards and fire risk following a collision.(2) Ensuring the safety of commercial drivers, first responders, other motorists, pedestrians, and surrounding communities.(3) Evaluating the health risks posed by toxic materials emitted into the air and establishing a safe and reasonable safety buffer to mitigate these risks.(4) Reducing wildfire risk.(5) Preventing structural damage to bridges and overpasses.(6) Achieving the most effective results using the least resources possible, including, but not limited to, water and air support resources.(7) Minimizing the duration of roadway closures.(8) Mitigating the risk of battery reignition.(c) In developing the action plan, the office shall consult with relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Transportation, electric truck manufacturers, and labor organizations.(d) In developing the action plan, the office may also consult with any relevant state or federal agency.